Utah statutes.
17-31-2.   Purposes of transient room tax and expenditure of revenues -- Purchase or lease of facilities -- Mitigating impacts of recreation, tourism, or conventions -- Issuance of bonds.

(1)  Any county legislative body may impose the transient room tax provided for in Section 59-12-301 for the purposes of:

(a)  establishing and promoting recreation, tourism, film production, and conventions;

(b)  acquiring, leasing, constructing, furnishing, maintaining, or operating:

(i)  convention meeting rooms;

(ii)  exhibit halls;

(iii)  visitor information centers;

(iv)  museums;

(v)  sports and recreation facilities including practice fields, stadiums, and arenas; and

(vi)  related facilities;

(c)  acquiring land, leasing land, or making payments for construction or infrastructure improvements required for or related to the purposes listed in Subsection (1)(b); and

(d)  as required to mitigate the impacts of recreation, tourism, or conventions in counties of the fourth, fifth, and sixth class, paying for:

(i)  solid waste disposal operations;

(ii)  emergency medical services;

(iii)  search and rescue activities; and

(iv)  law enforcement activities.

(2)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), a county may not expend more than 1/3 of the revenues generated by the transient room tax provided in Section 59-12-301 for any combination of the following purposes:

(a) (i)  acquiring, leasing, constructing, furnishing, maintaining, or operating:

(A)  convention meeting rooms;

(B)  exhibit halls;

(C)  visitor information centers;

(D)  museums;

(E)  sports and recreation facilities including practice fields, stadiums, and arenas; and

(F)  related facilities; and

(ii)  acquiring land, leasing land, or making payments for construction or infrastructure improvements required for or related to the purposes described in Subsection (2)(a)(i);

(b)  as required to mitigate the impacts of recreation, tourism, or conventions in counties of the fourth, fifth, and sixth class, to pay for:

(i)  solid waste disposal operations;

(ii)  emergency medical services;

(iii)  search and rescue activities; and

(iv)  law enforcement activities; or

(c)  making the annual payment of principal, interest, premiums, and necessary reserves for any or the aggregate of bonds authorized under Subsection (3).

(3) (a)  The county legislative body may issue bonds or cause bonds to be issued, as permitted by law, to pay all or part of any costs incurred for the purposes set forth in Subsection (2)(a) or (b) that are permitted to be paid from bond proceeds.

(b)  Except as provided in Subsection (4), if the revenues generated by the transient room tax provided in Section 59-12-301 are not needed for payment of principal, interest, premiums, and reserves on bonds issued as provided in Subsection (2)(c), the county legislative body shall expend those revenues as provided in Subsection (1), subject to the limitation of Subsection (2).

(4)  If, on or after October 1, 2006, a county legislative body imposes a tax or increases the rate of a tax in accordance with Section 59-12-301 at a rate that exceeds 3%, the county legislative body:

(a)  may expend revenues generated by the portion of the rate that exceeds 3% for any purpose described in Subsections (1) through (3); and

(b)  is not subject to any limits on the amount of revenues that may be expended for a purpose described in Subsection (2).



Amended by Chapter 328, 2006 General Session

